Washington statutes.
RCW 18.08.430

Renewal of certificates of registration—Withdrawal—Continuing professional development.

(1) The renewal date for certificates of registration shall be set by the director in accordance with RCW 43.24.086. Registrants who fail to pay the renewal fee within thirty days of the due date shall pay all delinquent fees plus a penalty fee equal to one-third of the renewal fee. A registrant who fails to pay a renewal fee for a period of five years may be reinstated under such circumstances as the board determines. The renewal and penalty fees and the frequency of renewal assessment shall be authorized under this chapter. Renewal date for certificates of authorization shall be the anniversary of the date of authorization.

(2) Any registrant in good standing may withdraw from the practice of architecture by giving written notice to the director, and may within five years thereafter resume active practice upon payment of the then-current renewal fee. A registrant may be reinstated after a withdrawal of more than five years under such circumstances as the board determines.

(3) A registered architect must demonstrate professional development since the architect's last renewal or initial registration, as the case may be. The board shall by rule describe professional development activities acceptable to the board and the form of documentation of the activities required by the board. The board may decline to renew a registration if the architect's professional development activities do not meet the standards set by the board by rule. When adopting rules under the authority of this subsection, the board shall strive to ensure that the rules are consistent with the continuing professional education requirements and systems in use by national professional organizations representing architects and in use by other states.

(a) A registered architect shall, as part of his or her license renewal, certify that he or she has completed the required continuing professional development required by this section.

(b) The board may adopt reasonable exemptions from the requirements of this section.

[ 2010 c 129 s 10; 1985 c 37 s 14.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2010 c 129 ss 7-10: See note following RCW 18.08.370.